Utah statutes.
13-11-2.   Construction and purposes of act.

This act shall be construed liberally to promote the following policies:

(1)  to simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing consumer sales practices;

(2)  to protect consumers from suppliers who commit deceptive and unconscionable sales practices;

(3)  to encourage the development of fair consumer sales practices;

(4)  to make state regulation of consumer sales practices not inconsistent with the policies of the Federal Trade Commission Act relating to consumer protection;

(5)  to make uniform the law, including the administrative rules, with respect to the subject of this act among those states which enact similar laws; and

(6)  to recognize and protect suppliers who in good faith comply with the provisions of this act.



Enacted by Chapter 188, 1973 General Session

